src/morphology/stems/adj.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_VÄÄRTTI
!!  Stems with quantitative t gradation, i final and front harmony are in class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}} and dictionary class ⁵⁻C.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 t~0 front
!!€  väärtti: väärtti+A+Sg+Nom # worthy
!!€  väärtissä: väärtti+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  väärtteinä: väärtti+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  väärteistä: väärtti+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  väärttien: väärtti+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  väärtimpi: väärtti+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  väärtein: väärtti+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ti  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ti  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ti  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ti  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no bisyllabic adjectives ending in vowel and gradating -pi.

LEXICON ADJ_TUHTI
!!  Stems with t ~ d gradation, i final and back harmony are in class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}} and dictionary class ⁵⁻F.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 t~d back
!!€  tuhti: tuhti+A+Sg+Nom # stocky
!!€  tuhdissa: tuhti+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  tuhteina: tuhti+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  tuhdeista: tuhti+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  tuhtien: tuhti+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  tuhdimpi: tuhti+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  tuhdein: tuhti+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:di  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:de  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:di  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_REHTI
!!  Stems with t ~ d gradation, i final and front harmony are in class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}} and dictionary class ⁵⁻F.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 t~d front
!!€  rehti: rehti+A+Sg+Nom
!!€  rehdissä: rehti+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  rehteinä: rehti+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  rehdeistä: rehti+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  rehtien: rehti+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  rehdimpi: rehti+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  rehdein: rehti+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ti  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ti  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:di  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:de  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ti  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ti  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:di  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no adjectives with i stems with other gradations.

!!  !Trisyllabic and longer i stems

LEXICON ADJ_ABNORMAALI
!!  The i stems with trisyllabic allomorph sets have class {{@LEXNAME@}}, and
!!  dictionary class of ⁶.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 6 back
!!€  abnormaali: abnormaali+A+Sg+Nom # abnormal
!!€  abnormaaleja: abnormaali+A+Pl+Par
!!€  abnormaaleiden: abnormaali+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  abnormaalimpi: abnormaali+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  abnormaalein: abnormaali+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:i  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI
!!  The i stems with trisyllabic allomorph sets have class {{@LEXNAME@}}, and
!!  dictionary class of ⁶.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 6 front
!!€  öykkäri: öykkäri+A+Sg+Nom # chav
!!€  öykkärejä: öykkäri+A+Pl+Par
!!€  öykkäreiden: öykkäri+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  öykkärimpi: öykkäri+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  öykkärein: öykkkäri+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;


!!  There are no adjectives acting like nouns where i-final nominatives have
!!  singular e stems.

!!  !Bisyllabic A-stem adjectives
!!  The a stems differ from regular nouns in one more feature: some of them,
!!  but not all, have a:e variation before the comparative stem. The selection
!!  of this feature may be phonological, but it is complex, and often there
!!  is variation between speakers. The plural partitives and genitives are a
!!  good indicator of classificaion of a, ä final stems, as are the vowels
!!  of comparative and plural stems.

LEXICON ADJ_AAVA
!!  Bisyllabic a stems with e comparative and j plurals are in class 
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, and dictionary class ⁹.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 9
!!€  aava: aava+A+Sg+Nom # open (of fields, plains)
!!€  aavaa: aava+A+Sg+Par
!!€  aavana: aava+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  aavassa: aava+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  aavoina: aava+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  aavojen: aava+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  aavoihin: aava+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  aavempi: aava+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  aavoin: aava+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_TARKKA
!!  The ka stem with e comparative and j plurals is {{@LEXNAME@}}, and the 
!!  dictionary class is ⁹-A or ⁹⁻D.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 9 k~0
!!€  tarkka: tarkka+A+Sg+Nom # pedantic
!!€  tarkkaa: tarkka+A+Sg+Par
!!€  tarkkana: tarkka+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  tarkassa: tarkka+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  tarkkoina: tarkka+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  tarkkojen: tarkka+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  tarkkoihin: tarkka+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  tarkempi: tarkka+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  tarkoin: tarkka+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_RAAKA

:  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

0:’a  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;

0:ka  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

0:’o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;

0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;

:’e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;

:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;

:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


!!  No a final adjectives with quantitative p gradation.

LEXICON ADJ_MATTA
!!  The ta stem with j plurals is {{@LEXNAME@}}, and the dictionary class
!!  is ⁹-C.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 9 t~0
!!€  matta: matta+A+Sg+Nom # matta
!!€  mattaa: matta+A+Sg+Par
!!€  mattana: matta+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  matassa: matta+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  mattoina: matta+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  mattojen: matta+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  mattoihin: matta+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  matempi: matta+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  matoin: matta+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJECTIVE
aituri+A:aitur  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
banaali+A:banaal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
bisarri+A:bisarr  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
brutaali+A:brutaal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
debiili+A:debiil  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
dementti+A:dement  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
demodulaattori+A:demodulaattor  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
diskreetti+A:diskreet  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
efferentti+A:efferent  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
epänormaali+A:epä#normaal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
epänormaali+A:epänormaal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
epästandardi+A:epä#standard  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
epästandardi+A:epästandard  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
epätarkka+A:epätark  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
epävarma+A:epä#varm  ADJ_AAVA  ;
evidentti+A:evident  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
fataali+A:fataal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
frekventti+A:frekvent  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
globaali+A:globaal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
hallanarka+A:hallanar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
harva+A:harv  ADJ_AAVA  ;
herja+A:herj  ADJ_AAVA  ;
hirmuhauska+A:hirmuhausk  ADJ_AAVA  ;
honkkeli+A:honkkel  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
huipputarkka+A:huipputark  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
huithapeli+A:huithapel  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
höntti+A:hönt  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
höveli+A:hövel  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
idioottivarma+A:idioottivarm  ADJ_AAVA  ;
ihmisarka+A:ihmisar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
ikivanha+A:ikivanh  ADJ_AAVA  ;
indifferentti+A:indifferent  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
inertti+A:inert  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
intelligentti+A:intelligent  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
itsevarma+A:itsevarm  ADJ_AAVA  ;
kaheli+A:kahel  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
kepuli+A:kepul  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
keskivahva+A:keski#vahv  ADJ_AAVA  ;
kiltti+A:kilt  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
kirkkoherranvirka+A:kirkkoherranvir  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
kiva+A:kiv  ADJ_AAVA  ;
koheli+A:kohel  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
kronkeli+A:kronkel  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
kserofyytti+A:kserofyyt  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
kserofyytti+A:kserofyyt  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
kuumanarka+A:kuumanar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
kylmänarka+A:kylmänar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
käyttövarma+A:käyttövarm  ADJ_AAVA  ;
laaka+A:laa  ADJ_RAAKA  ;
laaka+A:laa  ADJ_RAAKA  ;
laiha+A:laih  ADJ_AAVA  ;
langanlaiha+A:langanlaih  ADJ_AAVA  ;
legaali+A:legaal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
leuhka+A:leuhk  ADJ_AAVA  ;
liika+A:lii  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
lila+A:lil  ADJ_AAVA  ;
luurangonlaiha+A:luurangonlaih  ADJ_AAVA  ;
matta+A:mat  ADJ_MATTA  ;
mittatarkka+A:mitta#tark  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
mukoosi+A:mukoos  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
murtovarma+A:murto#varm  ADJ_AAVA  ;
mäntti+A:mänt  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
niukka+A:niuk  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
normaali+A:normaal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
nätti+A:nät  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
omantunnonarka+A:omantunnonar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
omantunnontarkka+A:omantunnon#tark  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
paha+A:pah  ADJ_AAVA  ;
pakkasenarka+A:pakkasen#ar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
palonarka+A:palon#ar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
paranormaali+A:para#normaal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
parka+A:par  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
passeli+A:passel  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
patalaiska+A:patalaisk  ADJ_AAVA  ;
pikkutarkka+A:pikku#tark  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
piukka+A:piuk  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
pomminvarma+A:pommin#varm  ADJ_AAVA  ;
preseniili+A:preseniil  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
puoliraaka+A:puoliraa  ADJ_RAAKA  ;
puoliraaka+A:puoli#raa  ADJ_RAAKA  ;
purppuranliila+A:purppuranliil  ADJ_AAVA  ;
raaka+A:raa  ADJ_RAAKA  ;
raaka+A:raa  ADJ_RAAKA  ;
raikuli+A:raikul  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
rankka+A:rank  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
raukka+A:rauk  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
rehti+A:reh  ADJ_REHTI  ;
resistentti+A:resistent  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
reversiibeli+A:reversiibel  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
riuska+A:riusk  ADJ_AAVA  ;
sanatarkka+A:sanatark  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
sankka+A:sank  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
sekuli+A:sekul  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
seniili+A:seniil  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
silkka+A:silk  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
simppeli+A:simppel  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
sinertävänliila+A:sinertävän#liil  ADJ_AAVA  ;
siviili+A:siviil  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
stabiili+A:stabiil  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
steriili+A:steriil  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
syömäri+A:syömär  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
sähköneutraali+A:sähkö#neutraal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
säteilyarka+A:säteily#ar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
söötti+A:sööt  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
taaja+A:taaj  ADJ_AAVA  ;
tarkka+A:tark  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
tikunlaiha+A:tikunlaih  ADJ_AAVA  ;
tiukka+A:tiuk  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
tomppeli+A:tomppel  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
tuhti+A:tuh  ADJ_TUHTI  ;
tulenarka+A:tulen#ar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
turhantarkka+A:turhan#tark  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
umpilaiska+A:umpi#laisk  ADJ_AAVA  ;
uusvanha+A:uusvanh  ADJ_AAVA  ;
valonarka+A:valon#ar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
variaabeli+A:variaabel  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
varma+A:varm  ADJ_AAVA  ;
vekkuli+A:vekkul  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
vesseli+A:vessel  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
vilunarka+A:vilun#ar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
vitaali+A:vitaal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
voitonvarma+A:voitonvarm  ADJ_AAVA  ;
väkivahva+A:väkivahv  ADJ_AAVA  ;
väärtti+A:väärt  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
öykkäri+A:öykkär  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
